District of Columbia statutes.
31-5009

Administrative appeals; judicial review.

(a)

Any applicant for insurance and any affected insurer may appeal to the Mayor within 90 days after any final ruling, action, or decision by or on behalf of any inspection bureau, the Industry Placement Facility, or the Joint Underwriting Association, following exhaustion of remedies available within such bureau, Facility, or Association.

(b)

All final orders or decisions of the Mayor made under this chapter shall be subject to review by the District of Columbia Court of Appeals under the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act.

History

Aug. 1, 1968, 82 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 90-448, title XII, § 1210
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 583, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 163(d)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1809.
1973 Ed., § 35-1709.

References in Text

The “District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,” referred to in Subsection (b) of this section, in the Act of October 21, 1968, 82 Stat. 1203, Pub. L. 90-614, codified as subchapter I of Chapter 15 of Title 1 (subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, 2001 Ed.).

Editor's Notes

Delegation of functions: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-5002.

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-5002.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.